Louisiana, session 2026, SB324.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:100.56(C), (O)(1)(b), (2), (3), (7), and (8) are hereby amended and
reenacted R.S. 39:100.56(K)(4) and (O)(12), (13), and (14) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§100.56. Water Sector Program
* * *
C. The Water Sector Program is hereby established to provide grant funding
for repairs, improvements, and consolidation of community water and sewer
systems. The division of administration, office of facility planning and control, and
the office of community development shall administer the program in consultation
with the Louisiana Department of Health and the Department of Environmental
Quality. The division shall establish a working panel comprised of employees of the
office of facility planning and control and the office of community development,
within the division of administration, the office of public health within the Louisiana
Department of Health, and the Department of Environmental Quality. The working
panel shall review and rate applications submitted by community water systems,
community sewer systems, and local governing authorities and submit
recommendations for funding to the commission.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 324 ENROLLED
* * *
K.(1) * * *
(4) The commission may approve modifications to the scope of work of
the original grant award. Commission approval shall not be required for minor
technical changes that do not affect the purpose of the project, including the
means and methods of construction.
* * *
O.(1)(a) * * *
(b)(i) Any monies deposited into the Emergency Subfund shall be used only
to provide emergency grant funding to address or mitigate an emergency related to
a community water system as defined in R.S. 40:5.8 or community sewer system as
defined in the state Sanitary Code, if such system is under a court-appointed
receivership in accordance with R.S. 30:2075.3, R.S. 33:42, or R.S. 40:5.9, or under
the appointment of a fiscal administrator, limited fiscal administrator, or receiver,
in accordance with R.S. 39:1351 et seq.
(ii) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, any award
of emergency grant funding shall be made in accordance with the procedures and
requirements for requests and approvals of funding for emergencies, limited fiscal
administrator, and receivership expenses as provided in the guidance promulgated
pursuant to this Subsection.
(2) The commission shall hold a meeting no later than September 1, 2024, to
submit priorities to the division to utilize in the development of guidance for
emergency grants and any new grants awarded pursuant to the Water Sector Program
on or after July 1, 2024. The commission shall update priorities to the division as
needed.
(3) Upon receipt, the The division shall promulgate guidance for the award
and administration of emergency grants and any new grants awarded after July 1,
2024. The guidance shall include application requirements, deadlines for application
submissions and approval, criteria for ratings, rate study and matching fund
requirements, a process for prioritizing critical infrastructure needs, and procedures
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 324 ENROLLED
for requests and approvals of funding for emergencies, limited fiscal administrator,
and receivership expenses. The Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.,
shall not apply to guidance promulgated pursuant to this Subsection. No later than
October 1, 2024, the The division shall submit the proposed guidance to the
commission for review and approval. Any changes to the guidance shall require
approval by the commission.
* * *
(7) Within forty-five sixty days of the end of the application period, the
division shall submit ratings of the proposed projects by the working panel
established in Subsection C of this Section and recommendations for funding for the
projects to the commission.
(8)(a) The commission shall review the ratings and recommendations
submitted by the working panel. The commission shall submit its recommendations
for grant awards to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. The
recommendations shall include:
(a)(i) The amount of proposed matching funds for each project or a
recommendation for a waiver or a decreased match for any project based on the
commission's determination that the local governing authority or water system is
unable to provide the full, required match.
(b)(ii) Funding for small water and sewer systems critical infrastructure
needs as provided for in the guidance.
(b) The commission may submit recommendations for subsequent grant
awards to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget based upon the ratings
and recommendations of the working panel without requiring a new application
period.
* * *
(12) The commission may rescind any grant award for a project if the
grant recipient fails to comply with the guidance approved by the commission.
(13) Any grant recipient that fails to comply with the rate study
requirements pursuant to this Subsection shall be ineligible to receive future
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 324 ENROLLED
Water Sector Program grant awards.
(14) The commission may approve modifications to the scope of work of
the original grant award. Commission approval shall not be required for minor
technical changes that do not affect the purpose of the project, including the
means and methods of construction.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.